Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-3003
Peace officer; disciplinary action;
inclusion in personnel record; restrictions.

No disciplinary action by any municipality
or county may be included in a peace officer's personnel record unless such
disciplinary action has been reduced to writing and the peace officer has
been given a copy, and no correspondence may be included in a peace officer's
personnel record unless the peace officer has been given a copy of the correspondence.
The peace officer shall sign a written acknowledgement of receipt for any
copy of a disciplinary action. This section does not apply to any municipality
or county accredited through the Commission on Accreditation for Law Enforcement
Agencies.

Laws 2009, LB158, § 6.